Massachusetts, session 194th, H237.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13C of Chapter 118E General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the second paragraph the following section Subsections (a) and (b):-
Subsection Section (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Employee organization”, a labor union or other organization, agency or employee
representation committee, association, group or plan in which employees participate and which
exists in whole or in part to deal with employers concerning matters incidental to employment
relationships.
of 3

“Direct care worker”, a person employed by an agency whose rates are set by chapter
257 of the laws of 2008, to provide direct care and/or medication administration.
“Direct care worker agency”, an entity employing direct care workers to provide services
whose rates are set by chapter 257 of the law of 2008.
Subsection (b) The executive office of health and human services shall establish and
maintain a Direct care worker Medication Administration Program registry of direct care
workers employed by a direct care worker agency.
A direct care worker agency shall report to the executive office of health and human
services the required direct care worker registry information for each direct care worker it
employs or contracts for the services of on a paid, unpaid, temporary or permanent basis who is
not exempt from the reporting requirement. Any exemptions from reporting shall be established
in regulations promulgated by the Executive office of health and human services; provided,
however, that the regulations shall include, but not be limited to, exemptions for victims of
domestic violence, rape, sexual assault or stalking.
The executive office shall collect the following reported information concerning each
direct care worker: (i) the worker’s full name; (ii) their assigned unique identification number;
(iii) their gender; (iv) their home address; (v) their mailing address; (vi) the full legal name of
any direct care worker agency employing the direct care worker; (vii) the worker’s job title; and
(viii) a list of Direct care trainings or certifications completed by the direct care worker. (ix) the
status of their Medication Administration Program certification, pass, fail or pending.
Reported information for each employed direct care worker shall be submitted and
regularly updated every quarter by each direct care worker agency subject to this section. The
of 3

registry shall be updated by the Executive office of health and human services at least quarterly.
A direct care worker agency shall collect and maintain the required information and submit
updated information in a timely manner as determined by the department. A direct care worker
shall not be responsible for any costs related to the registry.
The executive office of health and human services shall only make a direct care worker’s
full name, identification number, name of any direct care worker agency employing the direct
care worker and a list of direct care trainings or certifications completed by the direct care
worker available to the public unless such information is exempt from disclosure by the
department. Upon request from an employee organization, or direct care worker agency, the
department shall provide all reported information to such entities.
The executive office of health and human services shall promulgate rules and regulations
and shall provide such forms and notifications as may be necessary to implement this section;
provided, however, that the executive office of health and human services shall minimize any
duplicate reporting that may be required of a direct care agency.
Subsection C. This act shall take effect as of xx/xx/xx
of 3